Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-414.02
Prescription created, signed, transmitted,
and received electronically; records.

(1) If a prescription is created, signed,
transmitted, and received electronically, all records related to that prescription
must be retained electronically.

(2) Electronic
records must be maintained electronically for five years after the date of
their creation or receipt.

(3) Records regarding controlled substances must be readily retrievable
from all other records. Electronic records must be easily readable or easily
rendered into a format that a person can read.

(4) Records of electronic
prescriptions for controlled substances shall be maintained in an application
that meets the requirements of 21 C.F.R. 1311, as the regulation existed on
January 1, 2014. The computers on which the records are maintained may be
located at another location, but the records must be readily retrievable at
the registered location if requested by an agent of the department or the
administration or other law enforcement agent. The electronic application
must be capable of printing out or transferring the records in a format that
is readily understandable to an agent of the department or the administration
or other law enforcement agent at the registered location.

Laws 2014, LB811, § 8.